Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-139
National Guard; officers; powers and duties.

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed in this code, all officers of the National Guard shall have the same powers and perform the same duties as officers of similar grade and rank in the Army and Air Force of the United States insofar as may be authorized by the laws or regulations of the United States.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 15, p. 661;

C.S.1929, § 55-120;

R.S.1943, § 55-118;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 10, p. 596;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-118;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 37, p. 1594.

"This code", see section 55-101.